New York, session 2025-2026, A11190.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 13 of section 220.16 of the penal law, as 2 amended by chapter 75 of the laws of 1995, is amended and a new subdivi- 3 sion 14 is added to read as follows: 4 13. phencyclidine and said phencyclidine weighs one thousand two 5 hundred fifty milligrams or more[.]; or 6 14. within any facility owned or operated by the state or any poli- 7 tical subdivision, agency, or instrumentality thereof, or within or upon 8 any school grounds, any controlled substance or any hazardous substance, 9 as defined by section 240.00 of this part, which has the potential to 10 cause significant injury or death, and such person has intent to sell or 11 otherwise distribute such controlled substance or hazardous substance. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15520-01-6